src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb-ynyDer
! verb-yny-to-verb
! The source stems have no stem vowel "ы", and therefore
! dervational suffixes come with an onset vowel

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Dim:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ышт V_SHUNY ; !!кольмыштны
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V:%>ышт  VerbConj ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Inf:%>ыштны K ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ыштны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ышт0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ышт WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Dim+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштл V_VOLYNY ;   !!??кольмыштлыны
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V:%>ыштл  VerbConj ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+Inf:%>ыштлыны K ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ыштлыны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ыштл00@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;
!+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ыштл WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Dim+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштлывл V_VOLYNY ;  !!??кольмыштлывлыны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыл V_SHUNY ;  !!тшӧктывны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ывл V_VOLYNY ; !!тшӧктывлыны
!+Der/ывлы+V:%>ывл VerbConj ; ! мынтывл - мынтывлан
!+Der/ывлы+V+Inf:%>ывлыны K ;
!+Der/ывлы+V+ConNeg000@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ывлыны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
!+Der/ывлы+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ывлы@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;
!+Der/ывлы+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ывлы WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысь V_LYDDJYNY ; !! вевттьысьыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сь+Der/ышт+Dim:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьышт V_SHUNY ; !!лэптысьыштны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьыштлывл V_VOLYNY ; !!?? вевттьысьыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьыштл V_VOLYNY ; !!лэптысьыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сь+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьл V_VOLYNY ; !!кутчысьлыны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Al:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ал V_SHUNY ; !!бергӧдчавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Al+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@авл V_VOLYNY ; !!бергӧдчавлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Asj:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ась V_SHUNY ; !! бертласьны


!<!-- This far 2012-01-19 -->

!+Der/овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ V_SHUNY ; !!пановтны


! Stray verb forms :-о


LEXICON VerbDer-V
+Der/тӧн:%>тӧн K ;
+v1+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg1:%>тӧнням K ;
+v2+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg1:%>тӧнним K ;
+v1+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg2:%>тӧннят K ;
+v2+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg2:%>тӧннит K ;
+v1+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg3:%>тӧнняс K ;
+v2+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg3:%>тӧннис K ;
+v1+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl1:%>тӧнняным K ;
+v2+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl1:%>тӧнниным K ;
+v1+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl2:%>тӧнняныт K ;
+v2+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl2:%>тӧнниныт K ;
+v1+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl3:%>тӧнняныс K ;
+v2+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl3:%>тӧнниныс K ;


! Page 346 in the Komi grammar
+Der/мысьт:%>мысьт K ; ! gerund (after the action) !353
+Der/мысь:%>мысь K ; ! !353
+Der/тӧдз:%>тӧдз K ;
+v1+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg1:%>тӧдззам K ;
+v2+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg1:%>тӧдззим K ;
+v1+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg2:%>тӧдззат K ;
+v2+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg2:%>тӧдззит K ;
+v1+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg3:%>тӧдззас K ;
+v2+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg3:%>тӧдззис K ;
+v1+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl1:%>тӧдззаным K ;
+v2+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl1:%>тӧдззиным K ;
+v1+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl2:%>тӧдззаныт K ;
+v2+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl2:%>тӧдззиныт K ;
+v1+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl3:%>тӧдззаныс K ;
+v2+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl3:%>тӧдззиныс K ;
!+Der/тӧдз:%>тӧдз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !396
+Der/мӧн:%>мӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !399-403
+Der/мӧнъя:%>мӧнъя WordEnd ; !399-403
+Der/тӧм+VAbe:%>тӧм PossessiveSuffixes ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger:%>тӧг K ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg1:%>тӧгъям K ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg2:%>тӧгъят K ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg3:%>тӧгъяс K ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl1:%>тӧгъяным K ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl2:%>тӧгъяныт K ;
+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl3:%>тӧгъяныс K ;
!+Car:%>тӧг PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; ! 390

+Car+Err/Orth:%>тӧгъя K ; !387
+Car+Err/Orth:%>тӧга K ; !387
+Car+Der+Der/AdvCompMod:%>тӧгмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !



! 2012-02-11 This is a problem; олан-вӧлан, овны-вӧвны
!LEXICON VerbPRT ! one verb, вӧвны 
!: preterite ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны WordEnd ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;

LEXICON EMYSHT ! эмышт "is a little / are a few"
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@+Ind+Prs+Sg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ WordEnd ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Prs+Pl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
 
LEXICON GER ! 3 lexicalised +Ger forms.
+Ger: WordEnd ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
